Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1040
Internet protocol, defined.

Internet protocol means the method by which data is sent from one computer to another on the Internet or other networks.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1011;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 22.